Georgia, session 2025_26, HB699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating a board of elections and registration for Dawson County, approved April 23,
1998 (Ga. L. 1998, p. 4680), as amended, is amended by revising paragraph (3) of
subsection (b) of Section 2 as follows:
"(3)(A) The governing authority of Dawson County shall designate one of the initial
members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection
and one of the initial members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1)
of this subsection to serve for terms ending on December 31, 2024, and until their
successors are appointed and qualified.
(B) The governing authority of Dawson County shall designate one of the initial
members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection
and one of the initial members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1)
H. B. 699
- 1 -

LC 62 0111/AP
of this subsection to serve for terms ending on December 31, 2026, and until their
successors are appointed and qualified.
(C) Successors to members designated pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this
paragraph shall be appointed to serve terms of four years and until their respective
successors are appointed and qualified."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 699
- 2 -